Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1075.5] Retaliating against a juror.
(1) A person commits the offense of retaliating against a juror if the person
uses force upon or threatens a juror or another person because of the vote,
opinion, decision, or other action of the juror in an official proceeding.

(2) "Threaten" as used in this
section means any threat proscribed in sections 707-764(1) and 707-764(2).

(3) Retaliating against a juror is a class C
felony. [L 1981, c 156, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

COMMENTARY ON §710-1075.5

Act 156, Session Laws 1981, enacted this section to provide
additional protection to jurors. Although the prior law penalized force or
threats used against a juror before or during a trial, it contained no
provision dealing specifically with the offense of force or threats directed
against a person for the person's actions as a juror, after the trial.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next